Utah statutes.
32B-8a-301.   Notice of intended transfer.

(1)  To transfer a retail license, at least 10 days before the filing of a transfer application with the department, the transferee shall file a notice of intended transfer with the department that states the following:

(a)  the name and address of the transferor;

(b)  the name and address of the transferee;

(c)  the type of retail license intended to be transferred;

(d)  the address of the premises to which the retail license is issued;

(e)  the address of the premises to which the retail license will be transferred;

(f)  an agreement between the transferor and the transferee that the consideration for the transfer of the retail license, if any, is to be paid only after the transfer is approved by the commission; and

(g)  any other information the commission or department may require.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a notice of intended transfer filed by a business entity for a transfer under Section 32B-8a-202, shall state the following:

(a)  the name and address of the business entity;

(b)  the name and address of the one or more persons acquiring ownership of 51% or more of the:

(i)  stock of the corporation;

(ii)  capital or profits of the limited partnership; or

(iii)  interest in a limited liability company;

(c)  the kind of retail license intended to be transferred;

(d)  the address of the one or more premises to which a retail license:

(i)  has been issued; and

(ii)  will be transferred; and

(e)  any other information the commission or department may require.

